District of Columbia statutes.
34-1128

New schedules to be filed; summaries of rates to be provided upon request.

(a)

Copies of all new schedules shall be filed, as hereinbefore provided, in every station and office of such public utility where payments are made by consumers or users 10 days prior to the time the same are to take effect, unless the Commission shall prescribe a less time.

(b)

Summaries of all rate schedules, including all rates, explanations, and conditions of service, applicable as to the type of service received by a ratepayer shall be provided as of right by the public utility to any ratepayer upon request and without expense to the ratepayer.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 981, ch. 150, § 8, par. 29
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-153, § 3(c), 31 DCR 6440
Rate change procedures, appeal and review, see § 34-901.
1981 Ed., § 43-528.
1973 Ed., § 43-328.